Utah statutes.
19-6-422.   Participation by state risk manager in suit, claim, or settlement.

(1)  If a suit is filed or a claim is made against  a responsible party who is eligible for payments from the fund for bodily injury or property damage connected with a release of petroleum from a petroleum storage tank, the state risk manager and his legal counsel may participate with the responsible party and his legal counsel in:

(a)  the defense of any suit;

(b)  determination of legal strategy and any other decisions affecting the defense of any suit; and

(c)  any settlement negotiations.

(2)  The state risk manager shall approve any settlement between the responsible party and a third party before payment of fund money is made.



Amended by Chapter 214, 1992 General Session

